Washington statutes.
RCW 18.120.040

Applicants for regulation—Written reports—Recommendations by state board of health and department of health.

Applicant groups shall submit a written report explaining the factors enumerated in RCW 18.120.030 to the legislative committees of reference, copies of which shall be sent to the state board of health and the department of health for review and comment. The state board of health and the department of health shall make recommendations based on the report submitted by applicant groups to the extent requested by the legislative committees.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 305; 1984 c 279 s 59.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.